Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4252.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 17748g. Except as otherwise provided by law, if a drug other than a controlled substance is packaged or repackaged by a manufacturer in a blister pack for distribution in this state, each blister cell of the blister pack or, if the blister pack does not contain perforated blister cells, the backing of the blister pack, shall contain, at a minimum, the generic name of the drug.